Hawaii statutes.
§325-72 Examination of sputum. The
bacteriologist of the department of health, when so requested by any physician,
or by the authorities of any hospital or dispensary, shall make, or cause to be
made, a microscopical examination of the sputum forwarded to the bacteriologist
as that of a person having symptoms of tuberculosis, which shall be forwarded
to the officer accompanied by a blank giving name, age, sex, nationality,
occupation, place where last employed, if known, and address of the person
whose sputum it is. The bacteriologist shall promptly make a report of the
results of the examination, free of charge, to the physician or person upon
whose application the same is made. [L 1911, c 118, §8; RL 1925, §945; RL 1935,
§1105; RL 1945, §2323; RL 1955, §49-61; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §325-72]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next